Wyoming, session 2025, HB0016.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-11-2201 and 35-11-2202 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 22
USED NUCLEAR FUEL STORAGE

HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
35-11-2201. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Consolidated interim storage facility"
means a facility that stores used nuclear fuel that is
reviewed for and receives any required specific licenses
from the United States nuclear regulatory commission under
title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations, part 72;

(ii) "Dry cask storage" means the storage of
used nuclear fuel that has been cooled utilizing
containers, including any components and systems associated
with the containers, that use a realistic security, seismic
and flooding design basis for the storage of used nuclear
fuel;

(iii) "Independent used fuel storage
installation" means an independent spent fuel storage
installation as defined by title 10 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, part 72, section 3;

HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
(iv) "Installation" means an independent used
fuel storage installation and a consolidated interim
storage facility;

(v) "Used nuclear fuel" means fuel that has been
withdrawn from a nuclear reactor following irradiation, the
constituent elements of which have not been separated by
reprocessing. "Used nuclear fuel" includes the special
nuclear material, byproduct material, source material and
other radioactive materials associated with fuel
assemblies.

35-11-2202. Used nuclear fuel storage installation;
application; siting requirements; funds.

(a) Any person undertaking the siting of an
installation shall do so in accordance with this article.

(b) Any person undertaking the siting of any
installation governed by this article shall submit an
application to the department before commencing
construction of the installation. The application shall
include:
HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253

(i) A copy of any application and other
materials submitted to the United States nuclear regulatory
commission;

(ii) A copy of any license granted to the
applicant for the installation from the United States
nuclear regulatory commission;

(iii) An acknowledgment in writing that the
installation will be temporary and will use dry cask
storage for the storage of only used nuclear fuel that
originates from a nuclear facility in the United States;

(iv) To the extent that the following
information is not submitted to the department under
paragraphs (i) or (ii) of this subsection, the following
information:

(A) The criteria upon which the proposed
installation site was chosen, and information showing how
the site meets the criteria of the nuclear regulatory
commission and the department;
HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253

(B) The technical feasibility of the
proposed storage equipment and technology;

(C) The environmental, social and economic
impact of the installation in the area of study;

(D) Conformance with the federal guidelines
for an installation.

(c) Upon receiving an application and the information
required under subsection (b) of this section, the
department, through the director, shall approve the
application for an installation:

(i) Upon satisfactory proof to the department
that the applicant has obtained a license for an
installation from the United States nuclear regulatory
commission and is otherwise in compliance with this
article;

(ii) That uses dry cask storage; and

HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
(iii) That is temporary. The department shall
receive substantial assurances from the applicant that the
installation is temporary, including a license that is
time-limited from the United States nuclear regulatory
commission or other substantial assurances options
including a time frame for the movement of the used nuclear
fuel to be stored from the installation to a permanent
repository, delivery of the used nuclear fuel for
reprocessing or to a purchaser of used nuclear fuel for
reprocessing.

(d) Installations approved under this article are
exempt from the jurisdiction of the Industrial Development
Information and Siting Act.

(e) Not less than thirty (30) days before a person
commences construction on an installation, the person shall
submit a report to the department that includes:

(i) The number of jobs that will be created in
the planning, licensing, site analysis, preparation,
purchasing, construction, transportation, operation and
HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
decommissioning of the installation and what number of
those jobs would be filled by Wyoming residents;

(ii) Local and state taxes that are estimated to
be generated by all aspects of the construction, operation
and decommissioning of the installation;

(iii) All benefits and impacts that will accrue
to the state and local community where the installation
will be located, including benefits from job training,
education, communications systems, monitoring and security
systems.

(f) The operator of each installation shall send to
the department copies of all publicly available reports,
notifications and violations sent to or from the United
States nuclear regulatory commission or the operator of the
installation as soon as practicable but not later than five
(5) days after the operator sends or receives the report.
The operator shall also transmit all information required
under this subsection to emergency management departments
of the local governments where the installation is located
HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
and shall make the information available on a public
website.

(g) Upon receipt of an application under this
article, the director shall, as soon as possible, apply for
any funds that may be available to the state from the
federal interim storage fund, the federal nuclear waste
fund and any other funds that are or may become available
to the state under any federal or state program. Nothing in
this subsection shall be construed to authorize the siting,
construction or operation of any installation not otherwise
authorized under this article.

(h) Any used nuclear fuel in storage at an
installation shall remain the property of the generator of
the used nuclear fuel or the civilian nuclear power reactor
owner, until the used nuclear fuel is transferred to
permanent storage or until the United States or a federal
agency takes title to the used nuclear fuel under the
federal Nuclear Waste Policy Act or other applicable
federal law.

HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
(j) This article shall be construed to avoid
duplication and to avoid interference with any of the
requirements of the United States nuclear regulatory
commission. Nothing in this article shall be deemed to
affect the authority of the United States nuclear
regulatory commission.

Section 2. W.S. 35-11-103(a)(xiii), 35-11-1501(a)(i)
through (iii), 35-11-1506(c)(intro), (iv), (x) through
(xii) and (e)(i)(A) and 35-11-2101(b) and (d)(iv) are
amended to read:

35-11-103. Definitions.

(a) For the purpose of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires:

(xiii) "This act" means W.S. 35-11-101 through
35-11-403, 35-11-405, 35-11-406, 35-11-408 through
35-11-1106, 35-11-1414 through 35-11-1432, 35-11-1601
through 35-11-1613, 35-11-1701, 35-11-1801 through
35-11-1803, 35-11-2001 through 35-11-2004, and 35-11-2101,
35-11-2201 and 35-11-2202.
HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253

35-11-1501. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "High-level radioactive waste" means as
defined in the "Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982" as
amended, 42 U.S.C. 10101 et seq. "High-level radioactive
waste" does not include used nuclear fuel as defined by
W.S. 35-11-2201(a)(v);

(ii) "High-level radioactive waste storage"
means the emplacement of high-level radioactive waste, or
spent nuclear fuel regardless of the intent to recover that
waste or fuel for subsequent use, processing or disposal;

(iii) "High-level radioactive waste storage
facility" includes any facility for high-level radioactive
waste storage, other than a permanent repository operated
by a federal agency pursuant to the Nuclear Waste Policy
Act of 1982, as amended. "High-level radioactive waste
storage facility" includes an independent spent fuel
HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
storage installation as defined in title 10 of the Code of
Federal Regulations part 72 section 3;

35-11-1506. Legislative approval of the siting of
high-level radioactive waste storage facilities;
conditions.

(c) With permission of the governor and the
management council, an applicant for either a monitored
retrievable storage facility or an independent spent fuel
storage installation may enter into a preliminary but
nonbinding feasibility agreement and study with the
director which shall be submitted to and reviewed by the
director, governor and the management council. The public
shall be afforded a thirty (30) day public comment
opportunity to review the feasibility agreement prior to
its submission to the governor and the management council.
The purposes of this feasibility agreement and study are to
allow the state to make a preliminary determination,
whether, on the basis of the feasibility agreement and
study, the proposed benefits substantially outweigh any
adverse effects and to allow an applicant based on the
state's preliminary review of any proposed benefit to
HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
determine whether or not a prudent investor, planner,
builder and operator would decide to proceed with an
application. Upon entering into a feasibility agreement,
the applicant shall pay to the state a fee of eighty
thousand dollars ($80,000.00). Effective July 1, 2018, and
annually thereafter, the fee shall be adjusted for
inflation by the department using the consumer price index
or its successor index of the United States department of
labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the calendar year
immediately preceding the date of adjustment. The fee shall
be used by the department for costs attendant to the
preliminary agreement. Excess funds collected may be used
by the department to review an application submitted under
W.S. 35-11-1502. Appropriate time shall be afforded the
director, the governor, the management council and the
applicant to prepare and to evaluate the preliminary
agreement and study, but neither the state nor the
applicant shall unnecessarily delay the feasibility
agreement and study. The preliminary feasibility agreement
and study shall not supersede nor replace other
requirements under this act. This agreement and study shall
set forth the following:

HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
(iv) The preliminary design plan and technical
feasibility of the planned temporary fuel rod high-level
radioactive waste storage facility;

(x) Substantial assurances that the facility is
temporary, including options for that assurance including a
time frame for the movement of the temporarily stored fuel
rods high-level radioactive waste to a permanent
repository, delivery of the stored rods high-level
radioactive waste to reprocessing centers or to a
purchaser, domestic or foreign, buying the rods waste for
future reprocessing;

(xi) A range of benefits the nearby communities
and the state might expect in return for temporarily
storing the fuel rods high-level radioactive waste, and a
best estimate of when the benefits might begin to be
received by the nearby communities and state;

(xii) A mutual review, by the state and
applicant, of a range of taxes the state might reasonably
impose on the facility and the fuel rods high-level
radioactive waste while they are in temporary storage
HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
including the annual acceptance taxes to be levied, on fuel
rods, based upon the weight, in kilograms, of fuel rods the
high-level radioactive waste stored at the Wyoming
facility;

(e) The legislature hereby authorizes the siting of
temporary high-level radioactive waste storage facilities
within this state subject to the following:

(i) A facility is authorized if:

(A) It is operated on the site of and to
store the high-level radioactive waste or spent nuclear
fuel produced by a nuclear power generation facility
operating within the state;

35-11-2101. Advanced nuclear reactors; requirements.

(b) Any person operating an advanced nuclear reactor
in the state of Wyoming in accordance with this section
shall not store spent used nuclear fuel or high-level
radioactive waste from the advanced nuclear reactor on the
site of the advanced nuclear reactor without first meeting
HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
all of the requirements of the United States Nuclear
Regulatory Commission.

(d) As used in this section:

(iv) "Spent Used nuclear fuel" means as defined
in W.S. 35-11-1501(a)(iv) 35-11-2201(a)(v).

Section 3. W.S. 35-11-1501(a)(iv) is repealed.

Section 4. The environmental quality council, upon
recommendation from the department of environmental
quality, shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement
this act.

HB0016

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0253
Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0016